Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202531-727.02
District; board of trustees; notice of meetings; minutes; clerk or administrator of district; duties.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1411, the clerk or administrator of each sanitary and improvement district shall notify any municipality or county within whose zoning jurisdiction such district is located of all meetings of the district board of trustees or called by the administrator by sending a notice of such meeting to the clerk of the municipality or county not less than seven days prior to the date set for any meeting. In the case of meetings called by the administrator, notice shall be provided to the clerk of the district not less than seven days prior to the date set for any meeting.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1411, within thirty days after any meeting of a sanitary and improvement district board of trustees or called by the administrator, the clerk or administrator of the district shall transmit to the municipality or county within whose zoning jurisdiction the sanitary and improvement district is located a copy of the minutes of such meeting.

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 11;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 18.